Washington statutes.
RCW 24.20.010

Incorporation—Articles.

Any grand lodge, encampment, chapter or any subordinate lodge or body of Free and Accepted Masons, Independent Order of Odd Fellows, Knights of Pythias, or other fraternal society, desiring to incorporate, shall deliver articles of incorporation to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW; such articles shall be signed by the presiding officer and the secretary of such lodge, chapter or encampment, and attested by the seal thereof, and shall specify:

(1) The name of such lodge or other society, and the place of holding its meetings;

(2) The name of the grand body from which it derives its rights and powers as such lodge or society; or if it be a grand lodge, the manner in which its powers as such grand lodge are derived;

(3) The names of the presiding officer and the secretary having the custody of the seal of such lodge or society;

(4) What officers shall join in the execution of any contract by such lodge or society to give it force and effect in accordance with the usages of such lodges or society.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9115; 1981 c 302 s 11; 1925 ex.s. c 63 s 1; 1903 c 80 s 1; RRS s 3865. Cf. Code 1881 s 2452; 1873 p 410 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.